Washington statutes.
RCW 19.86.020

Unfair competition, practices, declared unlawful.

Unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the conduct of any trade or commerce are hereby declared unlawful.

[ 1961 c 216 s 2.]

NOTES:

Hearing instrument dispensing, advertising, etc.—Application: RCW 18.35.180.